Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Hemophilia Treatment

200.550.
Hemophilia treatment program.

The Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs shall establish a Hemophilia Treatment Program within the office for the detection, diagnosis and treatment of persons suffering from hemophilia. The Hemophilia Treatment Program shall assist those persons who require continuing treatment with blood, blood derivatives, or a manufactured pharmaceutical product to avoid crippling, hospitalization, or other effects associated with hemophilia, but who are unable to pay for the entire cost of such services on a continuing basis.

The office shall also initiate activities with the advice of the Hemophilia Advisory Committee to:

Develop standards for determining eligibility for the care and treatment of persons suffering from hemophilia;

Assist in the development and expansion of programs for the diagnosis and treatment of hemophilia and related diseases including but not limited to home care and medical and dental procedures designed to provide maximum control over bleeding;

Provide financial assistance either directly or indirectly to persons suffering from hemophilia for the purpose of obtaining blood, blood derivatives and concentrates, and other efficacious agents for use in hospital, medical and dental facilities as well as in the home;

Provide for community educational programs for the detection of hemophilia and for the counseling of individuals and families suffering from hemophilia; and

Conduct educational programs for physicians, dentists, hospitals, health departments, and the public concerning the methods of detection, diagnosis and treatment of persons who have hemophilia.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1986, ch. 234, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 405, § 59, effective July 15, 1994.

200.560.
Hemophilia Advisory Committee.

There is hereby created a Hemophilia Advisory Committee for the purpose of acting in an advisory capacity to the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs regarding the hemophilia treatment program. The committee shall consist of nine (9) members. The executive director of the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs shall be an ex officio member. The other eight (8) members of the committee shall be appointed by the Governor and shall hold office for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualify, except that of those members initially appointed the terms shall be as follows: two (2) members shall be appointed for one (1) year, two (2) for two (2) years, two (2) for three (3) years, and two (2) for four (4) years. Appointments shall be made one (1) from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the following organizations: the Kentuckiana Chapter of the National Hemophilia Foundation, the Kentucky Medical Association, the Kentucky Pharmacists Association, and the Kentucky Hospital Association. The other four (4) appointive members shall be citizens residing within the Commonwealth who are hemophiliacs, parents of hemophiliacs, or health care providers interested in hemophilia.

Each appointive member of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement for his actual and necessary expenses in carrying out his duties.

Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments, maintaining representations as set out in subsection (1) of this section.

The committee shall elect a chairman, vice chairman, and secretary from among its members at its first regular meeting in each fiscal year and shall adopt rules governing its proceedings. The committee shall hold a meeting at least once every three (3) months and such other special or regular meetings as may be desired.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1986, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 405, § 60, effective July 15, 1994.